Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 5221.
Qualifications for licensure.

Applicants for licensure shall qualify under one of the following paths to licensure:

Possession of a bachelor’s degree, or higher, in forestry from a program approved by the Director, satisfactory completion of two years of the SAF Certified Forester experience requirements, and passage of the SAF Certified Forester examination, which may include a State portion if required by the Director by rule.

Possession of a bachelor’s degree, or higher, in a forestry-related field from a program approved by the Director, satisfactory completion of three years of the SAF Certified Forester experience requirements, and passage of the SAF Certified Forester examination, which may include a State portion if required by the Director by rule.

Possession of an associate degree in forestry from a program approved by the Director, satisfactory completion of four years of the SAF Certified Forester experience requirements, and passage of the SAF Certified Forester examination, which may include a State portion if required by the Director by rule.

Possession of a valid registration or license to engage in the practice of forestry issued by the appropriate regulatory authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, based on requirements and qualifications shown by the application to be equal to or greater than the requirements of this chapter. Such an applicant may be examined on forestry matters peculiar to Vermont and may be granted a license at the discretion of the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5222.
Applications for licensure.

Applications for licensure shall be on forms provided by the Director. Each application shall contain a statement under oath showing the applicant’s education, forestry experience, and other pertinent information required by the Director. Applications shall be accompanied by the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5223.
Issuance of licenses.

The Director shall issue a license, upon payment of the fees prescribed in this chapter, to any applicant who has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5224.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon payment of the renewal fee.

Biennially, the Director shall provide notice to each licensee of license expiration and renewal requirements. Upon receipt of the completed form and the renewal fee, the Director shall issue a new license.

As a condition of renewal, the Director shall require that a licensee establish that he or she has completed continuing education, as approved by the Director, of 24 hours for each two-year renewal period.

The Director may reinstate the license of an individual whose license has expired upon payment of the required fee and reinstatement penalty, provided the individual has satisfied all the requirements for renewal, including continuing education.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5225.
License and renewal fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5226.
Unprofessional conduct.

The Director may deny an application for licensure or relicensure, revoke or suspend any license to practice forestry issued under this chapter, or discipline or in other ways condition the practice of a licensee upon due notice and opportunity for hearing in compliance with the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 if the person engages in the following conduct or the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

:

has made or caused to be made a false, fraudulent, or forged statement or representation in procuring or attempting to procure registration or renew a license to practice forestry;

whether or not committed in this State, has been convicted of a crime related to the practice of forestry or a felony that evinces an unfitness to practice forestry;

is unable to practice forestry competently by reason of any cause;

has willfully or repeatedly violated any of the provisions of this chapter;

is habitually intemperate or is addicted to the use of habit-forming drugs capable of impairing the exercise of professional judgment;

engages in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public; or

aiding, abetting, encouraging, or negligently causing a substantial violation of the statutes or rules of the Vermont Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

Any person or institution aggrieved by any action of the Director under this section may appeal as provided in

3 V.S.A. § 130a

.

A person shall not be liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the good faith reporting of information to the Director about incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a forester.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.